Georgia, session 2025_26, HB405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 23 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
licensing of agents, agencies, subagents, counselors, and adjusters, is amended in Code
Section 33-23-5, relating to qualifications and requirements for license, by adding two new
subsections to read as follows:
"(e) Beginning July 1, 2026, an individual applying for a license as an adjuster shall show
that he or she is licensed as a residential-basic contractor, residential-light commercial
contractor, commercial general contractor, or commercial general contractor limited tier
depending on the area in which such individual shall be acting as an adjuster. The
H. B. 405
- 1 -

LC 52 0724
Commissioner shall by rule or regulation establish criteria and procedures for the scope of
practice for licensed adjusters and may provide for any exemptions or extensions for the
renewal of licenses for adjusters.
(f) An applicant who has a current valid license as a residential-basic contractor,
residential-light commercial contractor, commercial general contractor, or commercial
general contractor limited tier as provided in Chapter 41 of Title 43 shall be eligible for
licensure as an adjuster limited to such applicant's scope of practice. The Commissioner
shall by rule or regulation establish criteria and procedures for the scope of practice for
such licenses and may provide for exemptions to requirements for licensure as an adjuster
based on an applicant's experience or the qualifications for contractor licenses provided for
under Code Section 43-41-6."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 405
- 2 -